Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.480

Planning agency—Cooperation with agencies.

Each planning agency shall, to the extent it deems necessary, cooperate with officials and agencies, public utility companies, civic, educational, professional and other organizations and citizens generally with relation to carrying out the purpose of the comprehensive plan.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.480. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 48.]